Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,158
Foreign corporation; procedure and effect of revocation.

(a) The Secretary of State upon determining that one or more grounds exist under section 21-19,157 for revocation of a certificate of authority shall serve the foreign corporation with written notice of that determination under section 21-19,155.

(b) The Attorney General, upon determining that one or more grounds exist under subsection (b) of section 21-19,157 for revocation of a certificate of authority, shall request the Secretary of State to serve, and the Secretary of State shall serve the foreign corporation with written notice of that determination under section 21-19,155.

(c) If the foreign corporation does not, within sixty days after service of the notice is perfected under section 21-19,155, correct each ground for revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State or Attorney General that each ground for revocation determined by the Secretary of State or Attorney General does not exist, the Secretary of State may revoke the foreign corporation's certificate of authority by signing a certificate of revocation that recites the ground or grounds for revocation and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate of revocation and serve a copy on the foreign corporation under section 21-19,155.

(d) The authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in this state ceases on the date shown on the certificate of revocation revoking its certificate of authority.

(e) Revocation of a foreign corporation's certificate of authority does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 158.